Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 55. State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont
§ 1940.
Termination of service; death; refund; pension.

Upon the withdrawal of a member from service prior to retirement, the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions, less not more than one-third of the regular interest credited thereon as determined by the Board, will be returnable to the member. In lieu of the return of contributions:
(a) (1) Upon the withdrawal of a member from service prior to retirement, the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions, less not more than one-third of the regular interest credited thereon as determined by the Board, will be returnable to the member. In lieu of the return of contributions:

a member who has attained the age of 57 and completed at least five years of creditable service or completed 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010, may allow his or her contributions to remain in the System and receive a retirement allowance, commencing as early as age 55;

a member who has not attained the age of 57 or completed 25 years of creditable service as of June 30, 2010 but who has five or more years of creditable service may allow his or her contributions to remain in the System and receive a retirement allowance commencing as early as age 55 or when the combination of the member’s age and years of creditable service totals 90, whichever comes first.

In either instance set forth in subdivisions (1)(A) and (B) of this subsection, the retirement allowance shall consist of the annuity provided by his or her accumulated contributions with interest to the date on which the allowance commences, and a pension equal to a service retirement pension computed on the basis of the member’s compensation and creditable service to his or her date of withdrawal from service.

Upon the death of a Group A or Group C member before retirement the member’s accumulated contributions will be payable to such primary beneficiary, primary and secondary beneficiaries, or joint beneficiaries, if any, as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board. In the absence of a written designation of beneficiary or in the event the designated beneficiary is deceased, the return of accumulated contributions with interest payable as a result of the death of the member prior to retirement shall be payable as follows:
(b) (1) Upon the death of a Group A or Group C member before retirement the member’s accumulated contributions will be payable to such primary beneficiary, primary and secondary beneficiaries, or joint beneficiaries, if any, as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board. In the absence of a written designation of beneficiary or in the event the designated beneficiary is deceased, the return of accumulated contributions with interest payable as a result of the death of the member prior to retirement shall be payable as follows:

In the case of an open estate, to the administrator or executor.

In the case of a closed estate and the deceased member’s account is valued at less than $1,000.00, in accordance with the Probate Division of the Superior Court decree of distribution.

In the absence of an open estate or Probate Division of the Superior Court decree of distribution, and where the deceased member’s account is valued at less than $1,000.00 to the surviving spouse of the deceased owner, or, if there is no surviving spouse, then to the next of kin according to

14 V.S.A. § 314

.

In all other cases a probate estate shall be opened by the claimant, or other interested party, in order to determine the appropriate distribution of the proceeds of the deceased member’s account. When an estate is opened solely to distribute the proceeds of a deceased member’s account under this section, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may waive any filing fees.

In addition, if any member was in service at the date of the member’s death or on leave of absence granted subject to Board rules and had completed one or more years of creditable service, or if the member’s death was the result of an accident while in service or on leave of absence under Board rules, a pension equal to ten percent of the member’s average final compensation, but not less than $50.00 per month, will be payable on account of each of the member’s dependent children under 18 years of age, or, if a dependent student, under 23 years of age, not exceeding a total of three. However, if a surviving child of any age was mentally or physically incapacitated for substantial gainful employment before attaining 18 years of age, the pension will be payable for the duration of the child’s incapacity.

The survivors of a member who dies after December 31, 2006, while performing qualified military service shall be entitled to any additional benefits, other than benefit accruals related to the period of qualified military service, that would have been provided under the Plan had the member resumed employment and then terminated employment on account of death.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 226

, § 1;

1963, No. 110

, § 3, eff. May 28, 1963;

1966, No. 45

(Sp. Sess.), eff. July 1, 1965;

1967, No. 316

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 22, 1968;

1973, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1981, No. 41

, §§ 28, 39(2);

1989, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2007, No. 13

, § 28;

2009, No. 74

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2013, No. 22

, § 12;

2015, No. 18

, § 6;

2015, No. 23

, § 37;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 83.

§ 1941.
Optional benefits.

On or before the 15th day of the calendar month in which the first payment on account of a retirement allowance becomes normally due, but not later than the date on which the payment becomes normally due, each member shall elect to receive the member’s retirement allowance in accordance with one of the following forms of payment:
(a) (1) On or before the 15th day of the calendar month in which the first payment on account of a retirement allowance becomes normally due, but not later than the date on which the payment becomes normally due, each member shall elect to receive the member’s retirement allowance in accordance with one of the following forms of payment:

Option 1. A retirement allowance payable during the member’s life computed pursuant to section 1937 or 1938 of this title, whichever is applicable.

Option 2. A reduced retirement allowance payable during the member’s life, with the provision that at the member’s death a lump sum equal in amount to the difference between his or her accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement and the sum of the annuity payments actually made to him or her during his or her lifetime shall be paid to the person, if any, as he or she has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board; or in the absence of a written designation of beneficiary, or in the event the designated beneficiary is deceased, the residual amount payable as a result of the death of the member after retirement shall be payable as follows:

In the case of an open estate, to the administrator or executor.

In the case of a closed estate and the deceased member’s account is valued at less than $1,000.00, in accordance with the Probate Division of the Superior Court decree of distribution.

In the absence of an open estate or Probate Division of the Superior Court decree of distribution, and when the deceased member’s account is valued at less than $1,000.00 to the surviving spouse of the deceased owner, or, if there is no surviving spouse, then to the next of kin according to

14 V.S.A. § 314

.

In all other cases, a probate estate shall be opened by the claimant, or other interested party, in order to determine the appropriate distribution of the proceeds of the deceased member’s account. When an estate is opened solely to distribute the proceeds of a deceased member’s account under this section, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may waive any filing fees.

Option 3. A reduced retirement allowance payable during the member’s life, with the provision that it shall continue after his or her death at one-half the rate paid to him or her and be paid for the life of the beneficiary nominated by him or her by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board at the time of retirement, should the beneficiary survive him or her.

Option 4. A reduced retirement allowance payable during the member’s life, with the provision that it shall continue after his or her death at three-fourths of the rate paid to him or her and be paid for the life of the beneficiary nominated by him or her by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board at the time of retirement, should the beneficiary survive him or her.

Option 5. A reduced retirement allowance payable during the member’s life, with the provision that it shall continue after his or her death for the life of the beneficiary nominated by him or her by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board at the time of retirement, should the beneficiary survive him or her.

The benefits payable under options 2, 3, 4, and 5 shall be determined as actuarial equivalents of the retirement allowance under option 1. Any member who elects to receive a retirement allowance under the provisions of options 3, 4, or 5 may elect to receive a benefit further reduced actuarially as prescribed by the Board with the added provision that on the basis of stipulations contained in a plan-approved domestic relations order or if the retired member survives his or her nominated beneficiary, the retirement allowance that would have been payable under option 1 shall be paid to the retired member during the remainder of his or her lifetime. If a member does not make an election as to the form of his or her retirement allowance, the member shall receive his or her retirement allowance under the provisions of option 1.

A retirement allowance shall be payable to the eligible surviving beneficiary, if any, following the death of a:
(b) (1) A retirement allowance shall be payable to the eligible surviving beneficiary, if any, following the death of a:

Group A member who had attained age 60 or had completed 30 years of creditable service; or had not attained age 60 and had completed 10 years (but less than 30 years) of creditable service and was in service at the time of the member’s death.

Group C member who had attained age 55 and completed five years of creditable service; or had not attained age 55 and completed 10 years of creditable service and was in service at the time of the member’s death.

In order to be eligible to receive the retirement allowance, the surviving beneficiary must be nominated by the member by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the Board, and if the beneficiary is other than the spouse of the member, the beneficiary must be dependent upon the member at the time of the member’s death, provided that no person entitled to a pension under subsection 1940(b) of this title may be eligible for a retirement allowance under this section. The Board shall from time to time adopt uniform rules for determining whether a designated beneficiary was dependent upon a member; if, in the judgment of the Board, a surviving beneficiary in receipt of a retirement allowance would have ceased to be dependent upon the member had the member survived, the Board may discontinue the retirement allowance payable to such surviving beneficiary. The retirement allowance payable to the surviving beneficiary shall be equal to the benefit that would have been payable had the member elected option 5 and retired on the member’s date of death, computed in the case of a member who has not attained normal retirement age on the basis of a disability retirement allowance or an early retirement allowance, as provided in subsection 1937(c) of this title; without regard to whether the member has completed the eligibility requirements for early retirement, whichever provides the greater benefit to the surviving beneficiary. Such retirement allowance to the surviving beneficiary shall be in lieu of the payment of the member’s accumulated contributions provided under subsection 1940(b) of this title; provided, however, that the surviving beneficiary may elect to receive payment of the member’s accumulated contributions in lieu of such retirement allowance or may elect to convert the retirement allowance otherwise payable to the member into an actuarial equivalent under the provisions of option 2 of this section. Failing an eligible surviving beneficiary, the member’s accumulated contributions shall be payable in accordance with the provisions of subsection 1940(b) of this title.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 182

, § 1;

1967, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 1967;

1973, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1975, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1981, No. 41

, § 29;

1989, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1999, No. 53

, § 6;

2001, No. 29

, § 5;

2007, No. 13

, § 29;

2007, No. 13

7 (Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2015, No. 23

, § 38;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 1942.
Board of Trustees; Medical Board; actuary; rate of contribution; safekeeping of securities.

The general administration and the responsibility for the proper operation of the System and for making effective the provisions of this chapter are hereby vested in the Board of Trustees of the System, which shall be organized immediately after three of the trustees provided for in this section have qualified.

The Board shall consist of six trustees, as follows:

the Secretary of Education, ex-officio;

the State Treasurer, ex-officio;

the Commissioner of Financial Regulation, ex-officio;

two trustees and one alternate, who shall be members of the System and who shall be elected by the members of the System for a term of four years according to such rules as the Board shall adopt to govern the election; and

one trustee and one alternate, who shall be elected by the Board of Directors, Association of Retired Teachers of Vermont, who shall be a retired member of the System receiving retirement benefits, for a term of four years.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a trustee, except for the trustee elected by the Board of Directors, Association of Retired Teachers of Vermont, the vacancy shall be filled by the Board, which shall appoint a member of the System to serve until the next regular election is held. A vacancy in the office of the trustee appointed by the Board of Directors, Association of Retired Teachers of Vermont, shall be filled by that Board, which shall appoint a retired member of the System receiving retirement benefits to serve until the next regular election is held.

The trustees as such shall serve without compensation, but they shall be reimbursed from the funds of the System for all necessary expenses that they may incur through service on the Board.

Each trustee shall be entitled to one vote on the Board. Four concurring votes shall be necessary for a decision by the trustees at any meeting of the Board, and four trustees shall constitute a quorum of the Board. Any ex officio trustee may designate in writing a person within the trustee’s department, agency, or office to attend a meeting or meetings of the Board of Trustees in the trustee’s place. The designation shall be filed with the Secretary of the Board. A person so designated and an alternate attending on behalf of an elected or appointed trustee under this section shall have the same voting rights and responsibilities as the absent trustee at such meeting or meetings, except that the designee or alternate shall not automatically assume the trustee’s place as an officer of the Board.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the Board shall, from time to time, establish rules for the administration of the System and for the transaction of its business.

The Board shall elect from its membership a chair and a vice chair, and shall appoint a secretary who shall be the executive officer of the Board and who may or may not be a member of the Board. The Board may employ such actuarial, medical, and other services as shall be required.

The Board shall keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for actuarial valuation of the System and for checking the experience of the System.

The Board shall keep a record of all of its proceedings, which shall be open to public inspection. It shall publish annually a report showing the fiscal transactions of the System for the preceding year, the amount of the accumulated cash and securities of the System, and the last balance sheet indicating the financial condition of the System as shown by an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the System.

The Attorney General of the State shall be the legal advisor to the Board.

The Board shall designate a Medical Board of three physicians who are not eligible to participate in the System. The Medical Board shall arrange for and pass upon all medical examinations required under the provisions of this chapter, shall investigate all essential statements and certificates by or on behalf of a member in connection with application for disability retirement, and shall report in writing to the Board its conclusions and recommendations upon all the matters referred to it. If required, other physicians may be employed to report on special cases.

The Board shall designate an actuary who shall be the technical adviser of the Board on matters regarding the operation of the System and who shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith.

Immediately after the establishment of the System, the actuary shall make such investigation of the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members of the System, as the actuary shall recommend and the Board shall authorize, for the purpose of determining the proper mortality and service tables to be prepared and submitted to the Board for adoption. Having regard to such investigation and recommendation, the Board shall adopt for the System such mortality and service tables as shall be deemed necessary and shall certify the rates of contribution payable under the provisions of this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2023, at least once every three fiscal years following the establishment of the System, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the System, and taking into account the results of such investigation, the Board shall adopt for the System such mortality, service, and other tables as shall be deemed necessary and shall certify the rates of contribution payable under the provisions of this chapter.

On the basis of such mortality and service tables as the Board shall adopt, the actuary shall make annual valuations of the assets and liabilities of the funds of the System.

The Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall designate from time to time a depository for the securities and evidences of indebtedness held in the Pension Fund and may contract for the safekeeping of securities and evidences of indebtedness within and outside the State of Vermont in such banks, trust companies, and safe-deposit facilities as it shall from time to time determine, and the necessary and incidental expenses of such safekeeping and for service rendered, including advisory services in investment matters, shall be paid from the Pension Fund. Any agreement for the safekeeping of securities or evidences of indebtedness, except securities loaned pursuant to a securities lending agreement as authorized by subsection (q) of this section, shall provide for the access to such securities and evidences of indebtedness at any time by the custodian or any authorized agent of the State for audit or other purposes.

The Board shall enter into insurance arrangements to provide health and medical benefits for retired members and their dependents. The State is legally responsible for the costs of the health and medical benefits provided in this chapter in the amounts specified in section 1944e of this chapter. The Board may enter into insurance arrangements to provide dental coverage for retired members and their dependents, provided the State or the System has no legal obligation to pay any portion of the dental benefit premiums.

The Vermont Pension Investment Commission may authorize the loan of its securities pursuant to securities lending agreements that provide for collateral consisting of cash or securities issued or guaranteed by the United States government or its agencies equal to 100 percent or more of the market value of the loaned securities. Cash collateral may be invested by the lending institution in investments approved by the State Treasurer. Approval of investments shall be made in accordance with the standard of care.

The Board shall review annually the amount of State contribution recommended by the actuary of the Retirement System as necessary to achieve and preserve the financial integrity of the fund established pursuant to section 1944 of this title. Based on this review, the Board shall determine the amount of State contribution necessary for the next fiscal year to achieve and preserve the financial integrity of the funds. On or before November 1 of each year, the Board shall inform the Governor and the House and Senate Committees on Government Operations and on Appropriations in writing about the amount needed. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), eff. March 9, 1972;

1975, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1987, No. 92

, § 4, eff. June 23, 1987;

1989, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 25(b);

1991, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4;

1991, No. 265

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 36

, § 6;

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38(a);

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2005, No. 48

, § 2;

2005, No. 50

, § 6;

2007, No. 13

, § 30;

2007, No. 13

7 (Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 74

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 172, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2018, No. 11

(Sp. Sess.), § E.515.1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 84;

2021, No. 75

, § 6, eff. June 8, 2021;

2021, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 1943.
Investments; interest rate; disbursements.

The members of the Vermont Pension Investment Commission established in 3 V.S.A. chapter 17 shall be the trustees of the Pension Fund created by this chapter, and with respect to them may invest and reinvest the assets of the Pension Fund, and hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of the securities and investments in which the assets of the Pension Fund have been invested and reinvested. Investments shall be made in accordance with the standard of care established by the prudent investor rule under 14A V.S.A. chapter 9.

The Board from time to time shall set rates of regular interest at such percentages compounded annually as it determines to be equitable both to members and to taxpayers of the State, but not less than three percent nor more than five percent.

The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the assets of the Pension Fund of the System. All payment from the Pension Fund shall be made by the Treasurer or by a deputy treasurer, only upon vouchers signed by two persons designated by the Board. A duly attested copy of a resolution of the Board designating such persons and bearing on its face specimen signatures of such persons shall be filed with the State Treasurer as authority for making payments upon such vouchers. No vouchers shall be drawn unless it has previously been authorized by resolution of the Board.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no trustee and no employee of the Board or member of the Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall have any direct interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the Commission; nor shall any trustee or employee of the Board or Commission, directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an agent, in any manner use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the Board or Commission; nor shall any trustee or employee of the Board or Commission become an endorser or surety, or in any manner an obligor, for the monies loaned to or borrowed from the Board. The State Treasurer, with the approval of the Board and the Commission, shall adopt by rule standards of conduct for trustees and employees of the Board in order to maintain and promote public confidence in the integrity of the Board. Such rules shall prohibit trustees and employees from receiving or soliciting any gift, including meals, alcoholic beverages, travel fare, room and board, or any other thing of value, tangible or intangible, from any vendor or potential vendor of investment services, management services, brokerage services, and other services to the Board.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 110

, § 4, eff. May 28, 1963;

1967, No. 13

;

1967, No. 29

, § 1, eff. March 14, 1967;

1981, No. 41

, § 30;

1985, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 7, 1986;

1987, No. 80

, § 9, eff. June 9, 1987;

1997, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 50

, § 7;

2007, No. 13

, § 31;

2015, No. 23

, § 39;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 85;

2021, No. 75

, § 7, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 1943a.
Compliance with federal law.

Intent. The General Assembly intends that the Retirement System and any trusts or custodial accounts established to hold the assets of the Retirement System in accordance with subsection (b) of this section be maintained, in form and operation, so as to maintain the status of the Retirement System as a qualified plan under

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

as amended, and the tax exempt status of such trusts and custodial accounts under

26 U.S.C. § 501(a)

, to the extent that those requirements apply to a governmental plan as described in 26 U.S.C. § 414. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, this section shall be applicable, administered, and interpreted in a manner consistent with maintaining the tax qualification of the Retirement System as a qualified plan and the tax exempt status of such trusts and custodial accounts under 26 U.S.C. §§ 401(a) and 501(a), respectively.

Exclusive benefit. All assets of the Retirement System shall be held in trust, in one or more custodial accounts treated as trusts in accordance with

26 U.S.C. § 401(f)

, or in a combination thereof. Under any trust or custodial account, it shall be impossible at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities with respect to members and their beneficiaries for any part of the corpus or income to be used for, or diverted to, purposes other than the exclusive benefit of members and their beneficiaries. However, this requirement shall not prohibit:

the return of a contribution within six months after the Retirement System determines that the contribution was made by a mistake of fact; or

payment of the expenses of the Retirement System.

Vesting on plan termination. In the event of the termination of the Retirement System, the accrued benefits of eligible members shall become fully and immediately vested.

Forfeitures. Service credits forfeited by a member for any reason shall not be applied to increase the benefits of any other member.

Required distributions. Distributions shall begin to be made not later than the member’s required beginning date as defined under

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

(9) and shall be made in accordance with all other requirements of that subsection. Benefits shall be paid under the maximum allowance pursuant to this subsection even though the member has not previously applied to receive them. The System shall be deemed to be in compliance with the terms of

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

(9) so long as it is administered under a reasonable good faith interpretation of that subsection.

Limitation on benefits. Benefits shall not be payable to the extent that they exceed the limitations imposed by 26 U.S.C. § 415, as adjusted for increases in the cost of living.

Limitation on compensation. Benefits and contributions shall not be computed with reference to any compensation that exceeds the maximum dollar amount permitted by

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

(17) as adjusted for increases in the cost of living.

Actuarial determination. Whenever the amount of any member’s benefit is to be determined on the basis of actuarial assumptions done by a professional actuary, those assumptions shall be specified by resolution, which documentation shall be incorporated in the System by reference. The Board shall also adopt interest and mortality assumptions for the purposes of determining actuarial equivalent benefits under the System. The Board shall adopt assumptions by resolution, which documentation shall be incorporated in the System by reference.

Direct rollovers. An individual withdrawing a distribution from the Retirement System that constitutes an “eligible rollover distribution” within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. § 402, may elect, in the time and manner prescribed by the Retirement Board and after receipt of proper notice, to have any portion of the distribution paid directly to another plan that is qualified under

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

, to an annuity plan described in

26 U.S.C. § 403(a)

, to an annuity contract described in

26 U.S.C. § 403(b)

, or to an eligible plan described in

26 U.S.C. § 457(b)

that is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state and that agrees to account separately for amounts transferred into such plan, or to an individual retirement account or annuity described in

26 U.S.C. § 408(a)

or (b), in a direct rollover. For distributions made after December 31, 2009, in accordance with

26 U.S.C. § 402(c)

(11), a nonspouse beneficiary who is a designated beneficiary under

26 U.S.C. § 401(a)

(9) may establish an individual retirement account into which all or a portion of a death distribution from the Retirement System to which such nonspouse beneficiary is entitled can be transferred directly.

Compliance with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act (USERRA). Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, contributions, benefits, and service credits with respect to qualified military service will be provided under the System in accordance with

26 U.S.C. § 414(u)

, unless State law provides more favorable benefits than those required by federal law.

Nonvested members; consent. An individual who is not a vested member of the System and who has not yet reached the later of normal retirement age or age 62 must consent to any withdrawal of his or her assets of greater than $1,000.00. For individuals who are not vested members of the System and who have reached the later of normal retirement age or 62 years of age, amounts greater than $1,000.00 may be paid out without the individual’s consent. In all cases, amounts of $1,000.00 or less may be paid out without the individual’s consent.

Rulemaking. The Board may adopt rules to ensure that this chapter complies with federal law requirements.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 13

, § 32; amended

2009, No. 24

, § 6;

2015, No. 18

, § 5;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 86.